



https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/72ubmh/north_korea_taps_gop_analysts_to_better/


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/asia_pacific/north-korea-seeks-help-from-republican-analysts-whats-up-with-trump/2017/09/26/ea91909e-a278-11e7-8c37-e1d99ad6aa22_story.html
	North Korea taps GOP analysts to better understand Trump and his messages 

	BERN, Switzerland — North Korean government officials have been quietly trying to arrange talks with Republican-linked analysts in Washington, in an apparent attempt to make sense of President Trump and his confusing messages to Kim Jong Un’s regime.

	The outreach began before the current eruption of threats between the two leaders but probably will become more urgent as Trump and Kim have descended into name-calling that, many analysts worry, sharply increases the chances of potentially catastrophic misunderstandings. 

	“Their number-one concern is Trump. They can’t figure him out,” said one person with direct knowledge of North Korea’s approach of experts on Asia with Republican connections.

	...But to get a better understanding of American intentions, in the absence of official diplomatic talks with the U.S. government, North Korea’s mission to the United Nations invited Bruce Klingner, a former CIA analyst who is now the Heritage Foundation’s top expert on North Korea, to visit Pyongyang for meetings.


If you look, you can find a lot of people trying to shape the perception of the conflict surrounding North Korea's missile program and the intentions of the parties involved in a way that pushes the conflict closer to disaster (see [here]((https://web.archive.org/web/20170929042710/https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/70ni31/mcmaster_we_have_to_move_with_great_deal_of/dn4s63d/)), and I think Bruce Kilinger is one of them.

Despite Congress' reluctance to point them out, it's hardly a secret by now that there are many people in positions of influence--journalists, pundits, subject-matter experts and even elected officials--who exploit their influence to mislead the public. Identifying, cataloging, and deducing the motives of these agents of influence is exhausting but instructive. If someone were to take up this task, they might find, as I have, a consistent pattern. Whether it's fake news sites in the U.S. and China blaming the other's government for unleashing a computer virus, Pundits in China and Japan claiming respective ownership of islands in the South China Sea, "experts" raising fears of all the ways Saddam Hussein might have weapons of mass destruction and terrorist ties, former officers of the Tsarist secret police printing anti-semitic literature in a German basement, Kuomintang partisans blaming the murder of a promising Chinese official on a president who fancies himself emperor, J.P. Morgan-owned newspapers urging their readers to murder socialists, or socialists urging their comrades to "further the revolution" by any means necessary, the effect is the same: these agents, witting or otherwise, have used their influence to create the conditions for war.

Of all the groups and interests charged with using their power to manipulate public opinion, which have employed their influence toward such destructive ends? The *Tanaka Memorial* would have believe a part of it was Japanese imperialists, the "Westmoreland Field Manual" claims another part was the CIA, the *Protocols of the Elders of Zion* tells us to blame a secretive cabal of Zionists, and Lenin, asking "[Who stands to gain?](https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1913/apr/11.htm
)," pins the blame on greedy capitalists scheming to profit off arms-dealing.

Lenin might have been brutal, but he was no dummy. When such a disparate range of people--from Chinese bloggers peddling fake news to American weapons experts with Ph.Ds--all mislead the public with the same phony narrative with no apparent gain for themselves, the question of *who* is ostensibly delivering these messages doesn't always tell us much, and we are left to ask *who stands to gain* from the message?


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1913/apr/11.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	“Who Stands to Gain?”
	Pravda No. 84, April 11, 1913

	There is a Latin tag *cui prodest?* meaning “who stands to gain?” When it is not immediately apparent which political or social groups, forces or alignments advocate certain proposals, measures, etc., one should always ask: “Who stands to gain?”

	It is not important *who* directly advocates a particular policy, since under the present noble system of capitalism any money-bag can always “hire”, buy or enlist any number of lawyers, writers and even parliamentary deputies, professors, parsons and the like to defend any views. We live in an age of commerce, when the bourgeoisie have no scruples about trading in honour or conscience. There are also simpletons who out of stupidity or by force of habit defend views prevalent in certain bourgeois circles.

	Yes, indeed! In politics it is not so important who directly advocates particular views. What is important is *who stands to gain* from these views, proposals, measures. 


Lenin concludes it was the arms manufacturers who stood to gain most from the warmongering leading up to the First World War ("That’s where the millions and milliards squeezed out of the workers and peasants for armaments go. Dividends of 12.5 per cent mean that capital is *doubled* in 8 years."). The Krupp's and Creusot's of Europe, in Lenin's analysis, had more than enough capital to buy-off  writers, professors, and officials in such quantity that the whole world could be steered toward war. But there are some flaws in Lenin's argument. The war was an economic disaster, for one, and even if it is to be believed that greed for profit is the ultimate motivator of men, the overwhelming majority of capital then was not in the hands of unscrupulous arms dealers.

With the benefit of hindsight, we can take Lenin's line of analysis and do better. We can take a look at the events of that period of history that led to the war, as many historians have done, with an eye for who came out on top in the end:


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**Historians have long argued about the causes of World War I. First it was Germany’s fault, then the Allies, then imperialism, then railroad timetables, then inflexible alliances, then Germany again. Most of us assume such a massive cataclysm required deep-rooted causes. Now it seems more historians are starting to see the origins of World War I as a series of miscalculations and accidents and think that war was in no way inevitable. Can you discuss the evolution of the historiography of the First World War?**

	Arguments about the origins of the First World War are as old as the war itself. Even as they were making the fateful decisions which sent Europe into the abyss, the leading statesmen of the belligerent powers had already begun “massaging” the record, with an eye on how posterity would judge them.

	...The early Cold War saw a surge in Marxist influence on the writing of history, with exciting new work done in social and economic history. Whether or not they were Marxists, historians of WWI felt the pull, looking into “structural factors” such as the arms race, the alliance system, imperialism and war aims, class interests and domestic factors. The most influential works of the era were Fritz Fischer’s Griff nach der Weltmacht (literally “Germany’s Grab for World Power”), published in 1961, and A. J. P. Taylor’s War by Timetable (1969). While Taylor did not go as far as Fischer in pointing to a premeditated German plan for war, he still faulted the Germans owing to the too-strict timetable of their mobilization (the famous “Schlieffen Plan”). 

	The convergence of opinion in this era was well illustrated in Barbara Tuchman’s bestselling popular history The Guns of August (1962). Curiously, most readers, even today, seem to think this book a chronological narrative of the origins of the war. In an editor’s note to the latest edition, Doug Grad tells us that the book chronicles “the month leading up to the war and the first month of the war.” And yet it does nothing of the kind. After sketching out the war plans of Germany, France, Britain and Russia (though not Austria-Hungary or Serbia), Tuchman skips through the assassination in Sarajevo and entire July crisis in one short paragraph, picking up her story only on August 1! Nothing could better illustrate the structuralist consensus of the era than this: a popular book on the origins of the war by a masterful storyteller which leaves out Austria-Hungary, Serbia, and all the diplomatic drama of July 1914.

	...It is only in the last decade or two that historians have rediscovered the actual events of 1914. There are two obvious reasons for this. The terrible wars in the former Yugoslavia reminded everyone of the importance of the Balkans. After 9/11, it was not so easy to dismiss the importance of the act of terrorism in Sarajevo which unleashed the furies of war in 1914. These lessons, along with the upcoming centennial, have brought forth a cornucopia of great new work on the subject. Albertini has been rediscovered; new evidence has emerged from the former Soviet Union, Eastern Europe, and the Balkans; and so historians now tell the story with much more nuance. The war may not have been an “accident,” but it was clearly contingent on various avoidable events, beginning with the assassination itself.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA42&lpg=PA42
	ON SUNDAY, 28 JUNE 1914, the 525th anniversary of medieval Serbia's terrible defeat by the Turks on the fields of Kosovo Polje, a young Serbian peasant named Gavrilo Princip fired two shots into the bodies of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria and his wife as they toured the Bosnian capital of Sarajevo, wounding both fatally. Because Ferdinand was heir to the Habsburg throne of Austria-Hungary and a man of controversial views in his own right, echoes from the "Sarajevo outrage," as it soon came to be known, reverberated quickly across European capitals. Accusations and counter-accusations flew between Belgrade grade and Vienna, spreading from there at second and third remove to Berlin, Petersburg, Paris, and London, as a growing mountain of rumors, half-truths, and obfuscations rapidly obscured the true nature of the crime. Lies about Sarajevo continued circulating for years afterward before the truth slowly emerged.

	By now, the basic outlines of the Sarajevo conspiracy are well known and little disputed. It is clear, to begin with, that Princip did not act alone. The assassin and his six accomplices (one of whom also tossed bombs at the archduke's motorcade) belonged to Young Bosnia, an offshoot of the Black Hand ("Union or Death"), a secret organization headed by Colonel Dragutin Dimitrijevic ("Apis"), Serbia's head of military intelligence. The Black Hand had trained Princip and his fellow conspirators; provided them with guns, ammunition, and explosives; and helped smuggle them and their equipment across the border into Bosnia.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	The Russian Embassy was an important element in the context. Before and during the first Balkan war--in which the Black Hand played a conspicuous role, organizing guerilla bands behind the enemy lines--the Russians gave financial and political support to the organization


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=Litr5ENSmfUC&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138
	...Rachkovsky was not yet the capricious master but still the plaything of others, whose dangerous games would come close to destroying him. Hauled in for interrogation by the Third Section in the spring of 1879, over his association with a certain Semionovsky who was suspected of concealing the assassin Kravchinsky, Rachkovsky was obliged to declare his true allegiance once and for all. He would, he confirmed, render the police whatever services they asked of him; his order was gratefully accepted, and he was directed to infiltrate the People’s Will without delay.

	In only a few months, concurrent with Rachkovsky establishing himself in St Petersburg, the People’s Will organisation, or Narodnaya Volya, had come to dominate the radical landscape in Russia


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okhrana
	Among the early Okhrana agents to work alongside revolutionaries was Lieutenant-Colonel Gregory Sudeykin of the St. Petersburg Special Section, who, in 1882, set up an illegal printing operation to publish the revolutionary People’s Will with Okhrana funds. Sudeykin and his colleague, a revolutionary-turned-police-informant named Sergey Degayev, passed drafts of the publication through Okhrana censors before printing. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	It was, of course, another assassin, Gavrilo Princip who, a month earlier on 28 June, had precipitated the impending catastrophe by his shooting dead of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austro-Hungary and his wife in their car as they drove through Sarajevo. The bloodied cobblestones of the Balkan city were a long way, in every sense, from the Sussex countryside around Brighton, where Kropotkin now lived, or the middle-class English Utopia of Hampstead Garden Suburb, to which he sent his letters to Kravchinsky’s widow, Fanny; and yet they were linked: on the bookshelves of the assassin Princip and his co-conspirators in the Serbian underground movement, two works took pride of place – Memoirs of a Revolutionary and Underground Russia. From them, and from the practical example of the old People’s Will, the Serbian nationalist movement to which Princip belonged had drawn inspiration and courage for their bid to end Austro-Hungarian rule in the Balkans and promote a pan-Slavic agenda.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...For a long time, not only the Russian military attache but the Ambassador, Hartwig, were in intimate contact with Apis. There is no suggestion that he personally pocketed any Russian funds, but the Russians looked upon him as their particular friend, if not quite their agent, and quite naturally tried to build him up in influence.
 
	...Artamonov, the military attache, continued, however, to see his Serbian colleague and friend nearly every day. It was natural enough: they were conducting a joint secret-service operation across the nearby Austrian border, with the help of a chain of Serbian customs inspectors and frontier guards who had been recruited as secret operatives of Apis. Artamonov's contribution to the operation had been to furnish some $1600--an impressive sum by contemporary Balkan standards--toward financing the clandestine network that Apis was setting up on Austro-Hungarian soil, particularly in Bosnia.

	...According to former collaborators of Apis, Artamonov was fully informed about the subversive as well as the intelligence aspects of the project

	...Artamanov admitted his close co-operation with Apis, but denied that he had been consulted about the assassination. He declared that he had been away from Belgrade on leave in Switzerland and Italy for some time before the crime was perpetrated, and to back this up, showed the Italian sleuth-historian his diary for the months of June and July, 1914. It contained no mention of the tragedy at Sarajevo. For the fateful date of July 24, there was merely the laconic note, “Austrian ultimatum to Serbia,” followed, Albertini says, by the usual statement of Artamanov’s daily expenses: “coffee-2 lire.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA46&lpg=PA46
	...While any conclusions must necessarily remain cautious, there is more than enough evidence to reconstruct a basic narrative of Russian intentions during the July crisis.

	A good place to begin is with reactions to the events in Sarajevo. There has always been something suspicious about Russian denials of foreknowledge knowledge of the assassination plot. Russia's military attache in Belgrade, General Viktor Artamonov, was out of town on 28 June 1914, giving him a convenient alibi but a strange one, considering that the whole point of Archduke Ferdinand's ill-fated visit to Bosnia was to kick off Austrian military maneuvers in Herzegovina, which would have been of great interest to Russia's official military observer in Serbia.

	...Albertini, after extensive interviews of all the principals, concluded that "Artamonov was told of the plot, if not directly by Dimitrijevic then by some other informant." Unlike Artamonov, Nikolai Hartwig, Russia's notorious minister to Serbia, was in town on 28 June, and at least one historian, L. C. F. Turner, thinks it "impossible" that Hartwig, "the constant guide and mentor of the Serbian Government" throughout the Balkan Wars, "was not consulted ... and did not have detailed knowledge of what was afoot."

	Whatever the truth about prior Russian knowledge of the Sarajevo plot, the reaction of Russian officials at the time does not suggest that the news took them greatly by surprise


&nbsp;


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	Of course the real test of Russian approval for the assassination was to follow. Austria, first politely, then insistently, requested a Serbian investigation of the crime, which clearly originated within Serbia. When that failed, Austria, along with Germany, turned to Russia, with the just request that Russia use its influence to prevail upon Serbia to investigate the crime. Russia’s foreign minister, Sazanov, flatly, and with provocative rudeness, refused to do so.
 
	Serbia had an absolute duty under international law to investigate any crime which originated in its territory. By refusing to do so, Serbia was intentionally instigating a war with Austria Hungary, and Sazanov knew this. Why would the Tsar’s government tolerate this action from its vassal state, if it did not want the war, that the Serbian refusal would certainly provoke?


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	As co-signatories to the anti-anarchist pact agreed in St Petersburg in 1904, Austro-Hungary expected Serbia to mount a comprehensive investigation of the conspiracy. Equally, it required the cooperation of Russia to pressure its fellow Slavs into compliance. The Serbs’ continued reluctance to concede fully to Vienna’s demands, even as the situation gusted towards a crisis, perhaps betrayed an uneasy conscience over covert official involvement with the conspirators, if not in the plot against the archduke itself. The Serbian police, after all, had enjoyed a good relationship with the Okhrana, learning from its methods. Nevertheless, the tension might have been defused, and the archduke’s murder have resulted in nothing more than an expulsion of diplomatic hot air, or at worst a minor regional confrontation, had not Austro-Hungary prepared to enforce its will by punitive military action, and the military alliance between France and Russia set in motion the engine of wider war. For as a member of the triple alliance with Germany and Italy, the mobilisation of Austro- Hungarian forces against Serbia triggered the terms of the binding agreement that required a response in kind by the governments in Paris and St Petersburg.

	As the man whose intrigues had helped secure the Franco-Prussian alliance and the St Petersburg Pact, Peter Rachkovsky must therefore bear his own small part of the blame for the outbreak of the First World War. Though dead, his influence lingered on as the Great Powers heaved their armies into readiness in the summer of 1914, and would continue to do so for many years to come.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...French strategy in July 1914 is a bit harder to discern than Russian. Once European war seemed likely, is easy to see why President Poincaré shared the Russian goal of manipulating Britain into supporting the Franco-Russians; but it is harder to understand why his line was so belligerent in the first place. Certainly France had no interests in the Balkans worth mentioning, and so in this sense Sarajevo was just as much "pretext" in Paris as in Vienna, Berlin, and St. Petersburg.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT287&lpg=PT287
	...A brief flashback to what had been happening behind the scenes in Vienna and in Belgrade, while the rest of Europe settled into its normal midsummer torpor, may be helpful at this point. From the moment the Kaiser had given his unconditional backing, the government of Austria-Hungary had virtually made up its mind to take some kind of military action against Serbia. The Emperor’s ministers and chief military advisers were not unanimous, however, as to its form. General Conrad wanted all-out war, with as little advance warning to the enemy as possible. Count Koloman Tisza, the influential Hungarian premier, a bushy-bearded, high-living, but exceptionally clear-thinking Magyar aristocrat, feared that this course would bring Russia in. Berchtold’s view, which ultimately prevailed, was a kind of sleazy compromise between two antithetical policies. As he told the German Ambassador on July 14, he proposed to send the Serbian government a note “so phrased that its acceptance will be practically impossible.” At the same time, the door would be left very slightly ajar to some solution short of full-scale war if the Serbian government showed last-minute evidence of reasonableness. In provoking Serbia, every effort would be made to minimize the provocation to Russia and France. For this reason the Austrian ultimatum to Belgrade would be held up until the French President had started home from his Russian visit; there would be no chance for a warlike brotherhood “being sworn at St. Petersburg over the champagne under the influence of Mrs. Poincaré, Izvolsky and the Grand Dukes.”

	A tragic accident in Belgrade may have heightened the dangers that were inherent from the first in Berchtold’s recklessly calculated risk. On July 10, Baron Vladimir von Giesl, the Austrian Minister in Belgrade who had been recalled to Vienna for consultation, returned to his post. At 9 o’clock that evening he received an unexpected call from his Russian opposite number, the redoubtable Nicolas Henrikovitch de Hartwig. The Russian Minister said that he had come to express his condolences “for the atrocious outrage” (Sarajevo), but there were undoubtedly other things that he wanted to say. What they were we shall never know. At 9:20 P.M., just as Giesl was launching into a soothing—and quite false—interpretation of Austria’s attitude toward Serbia, Hartwig suddenly slumped to the floor, unconscious. He was dead when a doctor examined him a few minutes later (he was overweight, and had suffered from angina pectoris for some years). An unpleasant scene ensued after the arrival of Hartwig’s daughter, Ludmilla. She brusquely repulsed the sympathy expressed by the Giesls, and poked about the room, sniffing at an eau de cologne bottle, and rummaging in some large Japanese vases. Her father had smoked only his own Russian cigarettes, but Ludmilla had wrapped up the two butts and put them in her bag. Had her father had anything to eat or drink? she asked with unveiled suspicion. In the tense atmosphere of the time, public rumor immediately made a poisoner of the unfortunate Giesl, who was even accused of having brought back from Vienna an electric chair which instantly killed anyone sitting in it.

	Hartwig had inside knowledge of the Serbian Black Hand and its methods (the Austrians were strangely uninformed on the subject, though the alert French Minister in Belgrade had already been able to ferret out for his government the Black Hand’s role in the Sarajevo assassinations).


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...Curiously, Poincaré had taken a harder line in the First Balkan War in 1912 than Russia's Foreign Minister, Sazonov, all but urging the Russians to take the plunge and mobilize (after which, he assumed, Vienna and Berlin would mobilize too) -- so there was a recent precedent in his thinking for a Balkan pretext leading to war with Germany. 

	As for why Poincaré took such a hard line, and encouraged Russia's early mobilization -- that remains one of the great questions of the July crisis.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT250&lpg=PT250
	...The infiltration of the police and the secret-service outlook into the higher policy-making levels of the Czarist state was no less evident in foreign than in domestic affairs. The Okhrana was particularly active in Paris, a major center of émigré revolutionary activities. It operated much as the GPU and the MVD were later to do. The chief agent was usually attached to the Russian Embassy with the rank of counselor; he rendered no accounts to the ambassador but was authorized to correspond with his chiefs through the diplomatic pouch. Co-operation between the Okhrana unit in Paris and the French Sureté was always close in the pre-war years.

	...To neutralize the chronic protest of French Socialists and Liberals against its operations on French soil, the Okhrana bribed French newspapers and journalists of the right who were willing to follow a pro-Russian line. According to an exposé of the Okhrana written in 1919 by one of its former senior officials, V. K. Agafonov, it financed a journalists’ club in Paris and paid regular subsidies to several important French newspapers, including the Echo de Paris, the Gaulois, and the Figaro. The last-named organ, according to Agafonov, for a while received 24,000 rubles—about $10,000—monthly from the Okhrana.

	When Izvolsky took over the Russian Embassy in Paris he promoted an arrangement with the French government for influencing French opinion that was more official, but hardly less conspiratorial, than the crude undercover operations of the Okhrana: the Russians would open a special credit, drawn upon the Czar’s secret funds, for the French government, which would then undertake to buy up the consciences—and the pens—of its own journalists in behalf of joint objectives. A letter sent by the Russian Prime Minister in October 1912 to his French opposite number—at that time Poincaré—pointed out one of the advantages of the proposed system: It would help keep within bounds “certain appetites and certain rivalries” in the French press which the Russians had learned from bitter experience were apt to be stirred up when they approached foreign journalists directly.

	There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. Izvolsky looked upon the dry, little Lorrainer, with his implacable irredentism, as the heaven-sent instrument of Russian foreign policy in France—“If Poincaré were defeated it would be a catastrophe for us,” he warned St. Petersburg before the French presidential elections of 1913—and one of the secret objectives of the press campaign that Russia was proposing to finance was to combat the “pacifist”—we would say today “appeasement”—and therefore anti-Poincaré, elements in French public life. “Do not forget,” Izvolsky once wrote his nominal chief in St. Petersburg, “that Poincare has to struggle with very influential elements in his own party which are generally hostile to Russia and openly preach that France must not be dragged into any war arising out of Balkan affairs.”


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	Russia coordinated with its French allies in mid July, in a state visit by the perpetually belligerent President Poincarre, and significantly, without any official records being kept. Russia had already started mobilizing before Serbia had even been presented the July 23rd demarche, by Austria.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT304&lpg=PT304
	...Even before the sheer velocity of events became intolerable, the Russian Foreign Minister, Sazonov ... had committed a momentous blunder. After the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia he obtained the agreement of the Cabinet and the approval of the Czar to the principle of a partial mobilization of Russian forces—involving a little over 1,000,000 men—along the Austrian border. This move, Sazonov argued, might scare the Austrians out of attacking Serbia, but would not threaten Germany, and in any case a soothing note to Berlin would accompany public announcement of the call-up.

	...If the Czar had stuck to his refusal not to let Russian mobilization go beyond the limited call-up in the south, peace might have been saved (although the Russian Generals had already begun surreptitiously to exceed the terms of the Imperial ukase). But between 3 and 4 P.M. on July 30, just as Bethmann-Hollweg in Berlin was drafting new instructions to his Ambassador in Vienna advising him that Germany “must decline to be drawn wantonly into a world conflagration without having any regard paid to our counsels,” Nicholas’ vacillant will suddenly buckled.

	It was Sazonov who effected this fatal result. Accompanied by a staff officer, he came to the Peterhof Palace, some 17 miles out of the capital, to try to convince the Czar that general mobilization could no longer be delayed. For more than an hour, in deferential but urgent tones, he marshaled his arguments in favor of mobilization. He had two particularly strong ones: a somewhat vague report that Germany, too, had begun to mobilize, and the arrogant tone of the Kaiser’s latest telegram declaring that he could not mediate in Vienna if Russia went ahead with the partial mobilization against Austria.

	...“Think of the responsibility you are asking me to take if I follow your advice!” he finally exclaimed. “Think what it means to send thousands and thousands of men to their death.”

	Unluckily, Sazonov’s companion, General Tatishev, chose that moment to speak up.

	“Yes, it is a terrible decision to take,” he said.

	“I am the one who decides,” Nicholas snapped.

	From then on he seemed more attentive to Sazonov’s arguments. He was particularly impressed by the Foreign Minister’s view—an erroneous one we now know—that Germany was bent on war and would go ahead whether Russia mobilized or not. At last, after what seemed a terrible inner struggle, the Czar gave in.

	“All right, Serge Dimitrievitch,” he said, “telephone the Chief of the General Staff that I give the order for general mobilization.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	...Mobilisation was ordered, and the tsar’s apparent decisiveness was rewarded with the support of the country’s socialists, while pacifst dissenters had no choice but to scatter into exile. The unity of the Russian people when faced by a national challenge would, it was hoped, expect a spiritual renewal and restore respect for the tsar. The immediate effect of the mobilisation, however, was merely to provoke Germany to respond in kind.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT314&lpg=PT314
	On August 1, at 7 P.M. Count Friedrich von Pourtales, the German Ambassador to Russia, red in the face and laboring under the nervous strain of a sleepless week, entered the office of Sazonov, whose amiable features were unusually taut. Rather brusquely the Germans asked whether the Russian government was disposed to give a satisfactory answer to the ultimatum presented by Germany the day before and timed to run out at noon. Receiving an evasive answer, he repeated his question, in a staccato voice. Once again Sazonov replied that the Russians could not demobilize, but that they were, as before, prepared to continue negotiations for a peaceful settlement. Both men were on their feet. The Count fumbled in his pocket and drew out the German declaration of war, which he read, breathing hard as he reached the final sentence:

		“His Majesty the Emperor, my august sovereign, accepts the challenge in the name of the Empire and considers himself at war with Russia.”

	Then, losing all control of himself, he ran to the window which looked out over the Winter Palace reddened by the evening sun, and turning his back on Sazonov, burst into tears. Sazonov wordlessly patted his shoulder, whereupon Pourtales burst out, “Never did I think that I would have to leave St. Petersburg under such conditions.” The two diplomats, who were also old friends, embraced each other, in the Russian style, for the last time.


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Assassination_of_Archduke_Franz_Ferdinand#Russian_military_attach.C3.A9.27s_office
	Serbian reservists being transported on tramp steamers on the Danube, apparently accidentally, crossed onto the Austro-Hungarian side of the river at Temes-Kubin and Austro-Hungarian soldiers fired into the air to warn them off. This incident was blown out of proportion and Austria-Hungary then declared war and mobilized its army on July 28, 1914. Under the Secret Treaty of 1892 Russia and France were obliged to mobilize their armies if any of the Triple Alliance mobilized. Soon all the Great Powers (except Italy) had chosen sides and gone to war.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA46&lpg=PA46
	Rounding out the picture of selective recordkeeping inside the Franco-Russian alliance, there are substantial gaps in Russia's own diplomatic correspondence with its envoys in Paris and Belgrade in July 1914, in the latter case for ten whole days following the assassination of the archduke on 28 June. Did the Russians have something to hide? The gaps in the record strongly suggest a good deal of purging took place after 1914. Missing files from Imperial Russia's Ministry of Foreign Affairs are particularly noteworthy, worthy, in that following the October Revolution, Soviet researchers had no compunction in publishing the most incriminating documents they could find in order to indict the benighted "imperialism" of the old regime.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...There may be one man still alive who knows the whole story; the Russian assistant military attaché, Captain Alexander Werchovski, who replaced Artamanov during his absence. A friend of Werchovski, a Polish nobleman named Louis de Trydar-Burzynski, stated in his memoirs, published in Italy in 1926, that “the assassination [at Sarajevo] was perpetrated with the support of the Russian military attaché at Belgrade, Captain Werchovski...” Werchovski, he continued, “was later War Minister in the Kerensky government; he was a young man whom I had known very well for years, and he told me quite frankly the truth about the origins, preparations and execution of the plot.” Unfortunately, Werchovski, if he is living today, is not likely to tell any more about the case; when last heard of, he held a high command in the Red Army—a curious detail in itself.


&nbsp;


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**So France wanted Alsace, Russia wanted the Straits, Germany had some vague desire for Lebensraum and a vague fear of encirclement, and Britain was thinking about Home Rule for Ireland. Not very good reasons to plunge a peaceful and prosperous Europe into hell. And yet, the people of Europe went to war in August 1914 with joy and brass bands and parades. Was it 99 years of peace that lulled them into war? Or an atavistic desire for violence and boredom with bourgeois prosperity?**

	Few historians still see things quite this way. There were a few parades, many volunteered to take up arms, and open opposition to the draft was rare, but the idea that the common people of Europe all marched off happily to war is no longer tenable. Entire books have been written by specialists to debunk "the myth of war enthusiasm," most recently by Mike Neiberg (Dance of the Furies. Europe and the Outbreak of World War I, Harvard 2011). Certainly many young men (most famously Hitler) welcomed the break from dull routine, the cameradie of military life and so on: but most people seem to have reacted to the war's outbreak more with trepidation and terror than bloodlust. 

	And this, mind you, is after the war began, with the national press in each belligerent already baying for blood. In its origins, the war of 1914 was almost purely a "Cabinet war," with even the invocation of "public opinion" (let alone the real thing) playing next to no role in the decisions to mobilize (with the curious exception of Russia, the least democratic and nationalist-patriotic of all the initial belligerents). 

	The fact that the war of 1914 was a Cabinet war does not make the story any less troubling, however. To me, it is, if anything, more unsettling that a conflict of such world-shattering proportions could be conjured up by such a small handful of men. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...Like the treason of Redl, the intrigues of Izvolsky, and the conspiratorial Witches’ Sabbath of the Okhrana, the murderers at Sarajevo demonstrate that overlaying the local power vacuum in south-eastern Europe caused by the breakup or decrepitude of the Habsburg and Ottoman Empires, there was a vacuum of responsibility affecting a much wider area. Responsible government was beginning to collapse under the strains of the modern age, just as civilization was beginning to crumble, in all the autocracies—and in some of their more-or-less democratic allies. (In the Balkans responsible government had never existed, at least not for centuries.) The breakdown, it is true, was limited; the regression to barbarism was noticeable only in certain contexts, the relapse into anarchy was confined to certain sectors. Philosophers continued to philosophize, and the plumbing, where it already existed, worked as well as ever. The trains ran—often on time—mail was delivered and taxes collected: drunkards were jailed and prostitutes had their cards stamped. Only the higher policy-coordinating centers of the state were affected. How grievously, was demonstrated, not only by Sarajevo, but as we shall now see, by the failure of the Old World diplomacy to prevent the crisis inevitably engendered by it from ending in the general European war that virtually nobody in Europe wanted.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**You have written three books about the origins of the First World War. What makes this topic so compelling?**

	The biggest draw for me as a historian is the stakes. The war of 1914 had such profound, and predominantly negative, consequences -- four years of industrial-scale slaughter all but destroying western faith in human progress, the violent break-up of empires which had endured for centuries, the bloodletting begat by the Russian Revolution and Civil War, the rise of fascism, Nazism, and all the rest. And yet the war, I have come to learn, did not have to happen, at least when and in the manner that it did. Many structural factors -- industrialization and the arms race, empires and alliances, nationalism and the spread of near-universal military service across Europe -- helped produce the carnage of 1914-1918 once the Great War broke out, but they did not cause the war, which could easily have been avoided had various contingent events, actions and reactions not transpired precisely they way they did in 1914.



https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/gavrilo-princips-sandwich-79480741/
	...the archduke’s chauffeur, a stranger to Sarajevo, gets lost. He swings off Appel Quay and into crowded Franz Joseph Street, then drifts to a stop right in front of Schiller’s.

	...Schiller’s delicatessen stood on the original route planned for Franz Ferdinand’s motorcade; indeed, the chauffeur’s fatal uncertainty was caused by the local governor, Oskar Potiorek, shouting at him from the passenger seat that he had should have stayed on Appel Quay. In other words, Princip was standing in precisely the right place to assassinate the archduke if the Franz Ferdinand had stuck to his plans, and so could hardly be said to be the beneficiary of some outlandish coincidence.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT304&lpg=PT304
	...If the Czar had stuck to his refusal not to let Russian mobilization go beyond the limited call-up in the south, peace might have been saved


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT287&lpg=PT287
	...[Hartwig] is believed to have broken off his originally close relationship with the fanatical brotherhood’s head, Colonel Apis, and in general, to have started putting the brakes on extreme Serbian nationalism, which he had earlier encouraged. His influence on the Serbian government was enormous; if his personal outlook on the Balkan problem had really changed as much as many historians think, his death at that crucial moment was undoubtedly a catastrophe for Europe. Giesl himself believed so. He later wrote that if Hartwig had lived beyond the “critical 25th of July,” the war would not have occurred.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**Had Gavrilo Princip missed, or had Archduke Francis Ferdinand left Sarajevo after the first failed assassination attempt (as his security detail advised), or had his driver not taken a wrong turn, would a World War broken out at some later date? In other words, was the assassination a spark that ignited an unstable international situation that would have probably exploded at some later date or can we just as easily imagine a Europe that would have remained peaceful for another 99 years?**

	This is one of the great counterfactuals of modern history. I do believe that, had Princip missed or the Archduke taken more sensible precautions for his own safety after the failed bombing attempt, nearly all subsequent history would have taken a different path. 

	...Might there have been a general European conflagration at some future point? One can never rule out worst-case scenarios, but there is nothing which would have made war any more likely than in the years before 1914, absent the precise sequence of events which transpired following Sarajevo


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Assassination_of_Archduke_Franz_Ferdinand#Russian_military_attach.C3.A9.27s_office 
	It could be argued that this assassination set in motion most of the major events of the twentieth century, with its reverberations lingering into the twenty-first. The Treaty of Versailles at the end of the First World War is generally linked to the rise of Adolf Hitler and World War II. It also led to the Russian Revolution, which helped lead to the Cold War. This, in turn, led to many of the major political developments of the twentieth century, such as the fall of the colonial empires and the rise of the United States and the Soviet Union to super-power status.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...My argument is not really that Russia is more responsible for the outbreak of war than the other two, but rather that the war which actually resulted in August 1914 was the war Russian policymakers preferred, not the one the Austrians or Germans wanted.

	...Whatever the merits of Bethmann's policies in July 1914, and I think they were disastrous, it is hard to escape the conclusion that the ultimate German nightmare of "encirclement" actually came true in 1914. Like cornered animals, the Germans lashed out, and they have much to answer for. But so, too, do the Bosnian Serb terrorists who assassinated Franz Ferdinand, the Austrian leaders who pushed for a war with Serbia, the statesmen in Paris and St. Petersburg who capitalized on the inept diplomacy of Berlin and Vienna to corner the Germans, and those in London who turned the European conflict into a world war. It did not have to happen.


------


http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
	The effects of World War I gave rise to the Russian Revolution of 1917. By the end of 1916, two years of total war had placed enormous strain on all combatant nations. None felt this more severely than Russia, which had entered the war confident but in a precarious political, economic and social state. The Russian economy made great industrial advances in the two decades prior to 1914, but it was still under-developed and ill-equipped to supply a prolonged war. Russia’s government was still dominated by the tsarist autocracy, which claimed political authority that was divine rather than popular. The Russian people were already fractious, dissatisfied and eager for change. In 1905 their demands had taken the empire to the brink of revolution, before tensions were eased with promises of reform – promises that were never truly fulfilled. The Russian empire rested on what historian Orlando Figes called ‘unstable pillars’, and they were unable to sustain its involvement in one of the most intense wars in history.

	At the epicentre of this turmoil was Nicholas II, tsar of all the Russias. Most historians agree that Nicholas was not equipped for governing Russia through difficult times. He was the son of an over-bearing autocrat and the grandson of a reformer, but was himself incapable of being either. Nicholas was determined to cling to autocratic power but he was blind to the problems this created and the threats it posed to his throne. The tsar professed to love the Russian people, yet he turned the other way when hungry workers were shot in January 1905, and when striking miners were machine-gunned in Siberia in 1912. Nicholas instead blamed Russia’s troubles on others: on foreign liberal ideas, on anarchists, on trouble-makers in the universities and on Jews (like many Russian conservatives he was an embittered anti-Semite). The tsar drew his advice and counsel from an inner circle of ministers, military officers, aristocrats and bishops – but too often they told Nicholas whatever he wished to hear, rather than what he should.

	The rapid descent into war in 1914 had caught the tsar unaware. Nicholas knew the German kaiser well enough to know he was ambitious and prone to rash decisions; but he did not think Wilhelm so treacherous that he would declare war on the empire of his own cousin. Nicholas made the first of several blunders in July 1914 when he appointed his cousin, Grand Duke Nicholas Nikolaevich, as commander-in-chief of the army. Nikolaevich had military training as a cavalry officer but had never commanded an army in battle; he now found himself in charge of one of the largest armies in history. In August 1914 the tsar and Nikolaevich – aware that most German forces would be occupied with the Schlieffen Plan in the west – planned an invasion of East Prussia. It was a bold campaign that might have succeeded if not for poor planning and leadership. The two Russian field commanders, Alexander Samsonov and Pavel von Rennenkampf, were competent officers but were both over-confident and vainglorious. They were also bitter rivals who could barely stand the sight of one another. Their squabbling and inept decision-making contributed to a disastrous defeat at the Battle of Tannenberg in late August 1914. Unable to face reporting the loss of 150,000 troops to the tsar, Samsonov took his own life.

	This culture of unaccountability and military incompetence was ingrained in much of the Russian military. After a year of fighting and several costly defeats, the exasperated Nicholas II decided to personally take command of the army. In September 1915, against the advice of his ministers, he dismissed Nikolaevich and proceeded to the frontline. The decision proved telling for two reasons. Nicholas’ distance from the Eastern Front in 1914 and early 1915 had buffered him from much criticism; his generals had instead footed the blame for military disasters. Now, the tsar would be responsible for every defeat, shattering the divine infallibility that many superstitious Russians believed he had.

	...By February 1917 the situation in Russia’s cities had become critical. Shortages of food and fuel were dire: the capitol city, since re-named Petrograd, needed sixty railway cars of food a day but often received barely a third of this amount. Inflation had been so severe through 1916 that the rouble had just a quarter of its pre-war buying power. In February, when a women’s day march through Petrograd merged with angry bread queues, the unrest spilled over into revolution. Soldiers ordered to fire on the crowd refused and shot their officers instead. The tsarina’s response was dismissive, writing off the unrest as a “hooligan movement”. Things eventually became so dire that the tsar decided to return from the front – but he was halted along the way by striking railway workers. While waiting on train sidings in Pskov, Nicholas II was met by his generals and members of the Duma (the national parliament). All but one demanded he sign an instrument of abdication, which Nicholas eventually did. More than 300 years of Romanov rule were brought to an end with the swish of a pen in a stranded railway cart.

	In different times, the departure of tsarism might have paved the way for a brighter future for Russia. The Provisional Government that replaced the tsarist regime did introduce some liberal reforms, like freedoms of assembly and the press, and amnesties for political prisoners. But facing international pressure, it refused to end Russian involvement in the war. The defeats, military follies, casualty lists and food shortages continued, and after six months the Provisional Government’s popularity had slumped.


http://alphahistory.com/russianrevolution/july-days/
	Between April and June 1917, the Bolshevik party was engaged in consolidating its position, recruiting new members and building support. Of particular importance was extending Bolshevik influence in the Petrograd Soviet, where the majority was still held by Menshevik and SR delegates. Lenin’s preferred tactic was to wait patiently while the party strengthened, while continuing to attack the government with propaganda and rhetoric and to promote the Soviets as the alternative government. But events in mid-1917 were fuelling the tinderbox of popular revolution faster than Lenin would have preferred. The Provisional Government’s adherence to the war radicalised thousands of soldiers and heightened calls for a Soviet revolution. On June 18th one military unit, the 1st Infantry Reserve, drafted resolutions calling for the overthrow of the government:

		The slaughter continues and there is an industrial collapse in the making. We see the rich lining their pockets from this criminal war and we sense and know that a sinister and terrible famine is approaching. We also see the jackals from the State Duma and State Council reaching out with their filthy paws to strangle freedom. The rights of the soldier are falling by the wayside; so is the reinforcement of the rights of freedom… We hotly protest any kind of bourgeois ministry and we demand that the ten bourgeois [ministers] make way. We demand that the All-Russian Soviet of Soldiers’, Workers’ and Peasants’ Deputies seize all power.











	In October 1917 a new political force, the socialist Bolshevik Party, emerged to seize control of the nation. Led by Vladimir Ulyanov, or Lenin, the Bolsheviks promised ‘peace, bread and land’ – promises that resonated with Russian workers, soldiers and sailors. Once in power the Bolsheviks commenced peace negotiations with Germany and, in March 1918, they signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk, formally ending Russia’s involvement in the war. It would prove a costly peace: Russia had to surrender large amounts of territory, people and fertile farmland.




------


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/eastern_front
	On 19 July, the Germans counter-attacked toward Tarnopol; the Russian formations opposing them simply vanished. The Central Powers advanced twelve kilometers on the first day of the offensive and captured Tarnopol on 25 July. By early August, the Russians had evacuated both Galicia and the Bukovina, surrendering all of the gains of 1916. In the chaotic flight to the rear, soldiers shot their officers and simply began walking home. For all intents and purposes, Russia disposed of no organized military force south of the Pripet Marshes. The counter-offensive nonetheless ground to a halt at the Galician border. Austria-Hungary had no further reserves to dedicate to the attack, and the Germans needed every available man on the Western Front. For the moment, Russia was spared.

	Ludendorff, however, was determined to drive Russia from the war and free up some of the eighty German battalions that remained on the Eastern Front. Shifting his artillery north, Ludendorff ordered an attack on Riga; if that city fell, he reasoned, the road to Petrograd would be open and Russia would be forced to conclude peace. 



https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/06/opinion/the-february-revolution-and-kerenskys-missed-opportunity.html
	The provisional government rapidly introduced reforms that would have seemed utterly transformative in peacetime, instituting universal suffrage and freedoms of speech, assembly, press and religion, and addressing the demands of the many national minorities who made up much of the Russian empire’s population. But none of this delivered the three things the people wanted most: peace, bread and, for the peasants, land.

	Of these failures, the most important was the failure of peace. The war continued, and in April it emerged that Milyukov had sent a telegram to the British and French governments, promising continued Russian support. He lost office shortly thereafter, and the Socialist Revolutionary leader Kerensky emerged as his successor.

	Despite the obvious lessons of Milyukov’s fall, Kerensky, too, continued the war. After touring the front, he succeeded in rallying the weary troops for yet another offensive. Despite some initial successes, the Kerensky offensive stalled, with heavy loss of life, repeating the grim pattern of World War I.


http://www.bbc.co.uk/history/worldwars/wwone/eastern_front_01.shtml
	Anarchist and Bolshevik agitators played their own part in destroying the Russian Army's ability to fight. Many anti-war radicals, along with the Bolshevik leader, Vladimir Lenin, were ferried home from exile in Switzerland in April 1917, courtesy of the German General Staff (which had spent roughly 30 million marks trying to foment disorder in Russia by the end of 1917).

	The summer offensive was a disaster. Peasant soldiers deserted en masse to join the revolution, and fraternisation with the enemy became common. Meanwhile, in an attempt to restore order and resist the German counter-offensive, most of the generals and forces of the political right threw their weight behind a plan for a military coup, under the Russian Army's commander-in-chief, General Kornilov.

	...The only winners were the Bolsheviks, with Lenin at their head, who were able to topple Kerensky and take power in the October Revolution of 1917- without significant resistance from either the government or the army.



https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT459&lpg=PT459
	Formal peace negotiations between Russian and the Central powers got under way at Brest-Litovsk, a railhead in western Russia then occupied by the Germans, on December 22. They were destined to leave a traumatic imprint upon the personality of the emerging Soviet power at the same time that they helped to transmit the revolutionary virus into the bloodstream of the Kaiser’s Empire.


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/western_front
	Utterly unbeknownst to the high command sitting on either side of the Western Front trenches, 1918 would be the last year of the First World War. Of the two sides, the Germans were more keenly aware of the seriousness of their predicament. Despite Russia’s collapse after the Bolshevik Revolution in 1917 and the subsequent Treaty of Brest-Litovsk on 3 March 1918, the Germans were still set to lose the war if it continued for much longer. The French and British remained in the field in the millions. Worse yet, the United States had joined the war on their side earlier in April 1917. Although the Americans took a long time to enter the field, by war’s end they had, on paper, an army of 4 million men: more than 1 million more than Germany had marched to war with in 1914.





https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT459&lpg=PT459
	The Russian delegation was headed first by A. Joffe, then by Trotsky himself. Both he and Lenin, despite the realism on which they prided themselves, had no realization of the trap into which they were walking. They took it for granted that the proletariat of the Western world would follow the revolutionary example of their Russian brothers within a matter of months or even weeks


https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/ni/vol02/no01/lenin2.htm
	“Reproaches have been made against me because of the Ultimatum. I put it forward only in the extremest case. When our CC members talk about an international civil war, that is a mockery. We have the civil war in Russia, but not in Germany. Our agitation is going further, but we are not agitating with words but with the revolution. And that remains. Stalin is wrong when he says that we do not need to sign. We must sign these conditions. If you do not do this, then you will sign the death warrant of the Soviet power in three weeks. These conditions do not infringe upon the Soviet power. I do not waver in the slightest. I do not put the ultimatum in order to withdraw it again. I want no revolutionary phrase. The German revolution has not yet matured. That requires months. The conditions must be accepted. If a new ultimatum then comes, we shall have a new situation.” (Lenin, Sämtliche Werke, Vol. XXII, p. 297.)


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT459&lpg=PT459
	...Bolshevik demagogy had disintegrated the Russian army as a force-in-being, and the Soviet government was virtually at the mercy of the victorious Germans. In a feeble attempt to exert counter-pressure the Bolsheviks intensified revolutionary agitation and propaganda among German or Austro-Hungarian prisoners of war held in Russia—a fateful step from the long-term viewpoint, but one without significant immediate results. Trotsky meanwhile used all the resources of his cunning to drag out the negotiations. Finally on March 3 after the German armies had resumed their advance, and were nearing Petrograd, the Soviet government accepted Ludendorff’s terms, signing away more than a quarter of Russia’s national territory and some 75 per cent of her coal and steel plants.

	The dissident Social Revolutionaries resigned from the government in protest against accepting such conditions, and the Bolsheviks themselves were badly split. Lenin had the greatest difficulty in persuading Trotsky to give up his dreams of resisting the German Army by sabotage and guerrilla warfare. The Whites in the south, encouraged by the demonstration of Bolshevik weakness and enraged by what they considered the Bolshevik betrayal of the national cause openly raised the standard of counter-revolution, with French and British support.

	By the spring of 1918 sizable White forces, led first by Alexeyev and Kornilov, then by Generals Krasnov and Anton Denikin, advanced from the northern Caucasus into the Don Basin, while Japanese military intervention in support of the local anti-Bolshevik forces began in the Far Eastern provinces. A combined British-Russian intervention force took shape on the Arctic coast at Murmansk. The Russian civil war, one of the most decisive conflicts in modem history—and also one of the cruelest—was under way. It was to rage back and forth across the former empire of the Czars—and even into some neighboring territories—until 1921, leaving famine and pestilence in its wake.



------



https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	Kim Il Sung, though impatient to invade South Korea, did not launch his attack until Stalin gave him permission. Stalin allowed the Korean War to begin in June 1950 largely because he had misjudged US policy. Intelligence from the United States, following its failure to intervene to prevent the Communist victory in China, indicated, he believed, that ‘the prevailing mood is not to interfere’ in Korea. That erroneous conclusion seems to have been based on his misinterpretation of a US National Security Council document (probably supplied by the KGB agent Donald Maclean), which excluded the Asian mainland from the American defence perimeter. Having thus misinterpreted US policy, Stalin was prepared for the first time to allow Kim to attack the South.


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/ACFAEF.pdf
	“Should We Fear This?” Stalin and the Danger of War with America

	...This danger was foremost in Stalin’s mind when Kim Il Sung first requested permission to attack the South, during the March 1949 visit to Moscow of the first official delegation from the newly-established Democratic People’s Republic of Korea (DPRK). The new sources reveal that Stalin turned down Kim’s request on the grounds that the US would regard an attack on the South as a violation of its 1945 agreement with the USSR about the division of the country at the 38 th parallel and would consequently be likely to intervene. Moreover, the Soviet leader regarded the question as not yet topical since American troops were still in Korea and the DPRK’s armed forces were not yet superior to those of the South. He did not object to the proposal in principle, however, nor did he seem surprised by it. Apparently sharing Kim’s assumption that such an operation was necessary, he regarded the issue as one of waiting for favorable circumstances.

	...The question of favorable timing for an attack on the South soon became topical, however, as reports reached Moscow of South Korean forays into DPRK territory. Erroneously assuming that the South Korean actions reflected American intentions, Stalin reached the false conclusion that the imminent withdrawal of US forces from Korea was designed to free the Southerners to invade the North—perhaps mirroring his own rationale for withdrawing Soviet troops in late 1948. In April he instructed his ambassador in Pyongyang, Terentii F. Shtykov, to assess the accuracy of intelligence reports that the Americans would soon move their troops out of South Korea to nearby Japanese islands. “The purpose of the withdrawal,” Stalin explained, “is to give freedom of action to the South Korean Army. By that time the UN Commission will also leave Korea. In April-May the Southerners will concentrate their troops near the 38th parallel. In June the Southerners will start a sudden attack on the North in order to finish the total destruction of the Northern army by August.”

	In reality, both patron and client in Seoul feared that the withdrawal of US forces would lead to the collapse of the newly established Republic of Korea, either through internal subversion or an attack from the North. It was this fear that led the US repeatedly to delay the withdrawal—from August to December 1948, then to March, May and finally June 1949. Moreover, while individuals within the South Korean government hoped to provoke an incident with the North in order to force the US to leave its troops in Korea, Washington was determined to avoid such an entanglement. As General W.L. Roberts, commander of the Korean Military Advisory Group (KMAG), bluntly put it during the border fighting in August, “the South Koreans wish to invade the North. We tell them that if such [an invasion] occurs, all [US] advisers will pull out and the ECA [Economic Cooperation Administration] spigot will be turned off.” American determination to avoid becoming embroiled in the intra-Korean conflict was clear enough to the Koreans that, as US Ambassador in Seoul John Muccio reported, they “contemplated the withdrawal of the US task force with genuine fear—even jitteriness in certain circles. They moved heaven and earth to have withdrawal deferred.”

	Despite having an extensive intelligence network in Seoul that would have known of the sharp divergence between American and South Korean intentions, Shtykov did nothing to correct his boss’ misperceptions. In his report of May 2 the ambassador noted accurately that ROK forces were being expanded with US assistance and that the government of President Syngman Rhee was taking steps to increase the combat readiness of its army, but he failed entirely to note the disparity in aims between patron and client. Instead—perhaps out of an understandable impulse toward self-protection—he merely repeated Stalin’s own conclusions, adding supporting detail.

	...After American forces withdrew from Korea in June and no invasion of the North ensued, Stalin was willing to consider a more forward strategy.

	...Stalin’s decision to consider mounting this limited offensive followed a recommendation from Shtykov a week earlier that such action was militarily advisable. The ambassador noted, however, that “the Southerners may have enough strength to counterattack, and then the fighting can take on a prolonged character.”

	...On 30 March Kim Il Sung and Pak Hon-yong traveled to Moscow for discussions with Stalin, remaining there until 25 April. In the absence of any records of these meetings, until now we have only been able to speculate about what constituted the “changed international situation” that Stalin believed made it possible to undertake the invasion and about why he insisted that the Koreans must secure Mao Zedong’s approval before the operation could proceed. The new sources illuminate these two important questions, in a report prepared by the Central Committee’s International Department summarizing the conversations Stalin had with Kim Il Sung and Pak Hon-yong during their April meetings. This summary deserves to be quoted in full:

		Comrade Stalin confirmed to Kim Il Sung that the international environment has sufficiently changed to permit a more active stance on the unification of Korea.

		Internationally, the Chinese Communist Party’s victory over the Guomindang has improved the environment for actions in Korea. China is no longer busy with internal fighting and can devote its attention and energy to the assistance of Korea. If necessary, China has at its disposal troops which can be utilized in Korea without any harm to the other needs of China. The Chinese victory is also important psychologically. It has proved the strength of Asian revolutionaries, and shown the weakness of Asian reactionaries and their mentors in the West, in America. Americans left China and did not dare to challenge the new Chinese authorities militarily. 

		Now that China has signed a treaty of alliance with the USSR, Americans will be even more hesitant to challenge the Communists in Asia. According to information coming from the United States, it is really so. The prevailing mood is not to interfere. Such a mood is reinforced by the fact that the USSR now has the atomic bomb and that our positions are solidified in Pyongyang. 

		However, we have to weigh once again all the ‘pros’ and ‘cons’ of the liberation. First of all, will Americans interfere or not? Second, the liberation can be started only if the Chinese leadership endorses it.

		Kim Il Sung expressed his opinion that Americans won’t interfere. Now that they know that the USSR and China are behind Korea and are able to help it, Americans will not risk a big war. As for Comrade Mao Zedong, he always supported our desire to liberate the whole country. Comrade Mao Zedong said on a number of occasions that after the Chinese revolution is completed, China will help us, if necessary, it will provide troops. However, we want to rely on our own forces to unify Korea. We believe that we can do it. 

		Comrade Stalin emphasized that a thorough preparation for war was a must. First of all, armed forces have to be elevated to an upper level of preparedness. You have to form elite attack divisions as well as create additional units. Divisions have to have more weapons, more mechanized means of movement and combat. Your request in this respect will be fully satisfied. 

		Then a detailed plan of the offensive must be drawn. Basically it has to have three stages. 1. Troops are concentrated in the designated areas, close to the 38th parallel. 2. The highest bodies of power in North Korea make fresh proposals for peaceful unification. These will certainly be rejected by the other side. Then, after they are rejected, a counterattack must take place. I agree with your idea to engage the adversary in the Ongjin peninsula as it will help to disguise who initiated the combat activities. After you attack and the South counterattacks it would give you a chance to enlarge the front. The war should be quick and speedy. Southerners and Americans should not have time to come to their senses. They won’t have time to put up a strong resistance and to mobilize international support. 

	...Nowhere has Stalin’s reasoning about the war been expressed more clearly. The key factor continued to be whether the attack would prompt the United States to intervene and thus possibly drag the USSR into direct conflict with its far more powerful adversary. That the Americans had not used force to prevent a communist victory in China suggested to Stalin that they would not intervene to forestall a similar outcome in Korea, as did Soviet acquisition of nuclear weapons. Most important, however, was the “information coming from the United States” indicating that “the prevailing mood is not to interfere.” While we cannot be certain what information Stalin was referring to, the reference appears to have been to the strategic policy for the Far East adopted in late December 1949, titled NSC-48, which drew the US defense perimeter to the west of Japan and the Philippines, excluding the Asian mainland. The timing of the adoption of this new policy suggests that knowledge of NSC-48, which Stalin was in a position to obtain through his British spy in Washington, Donald McLean, convinced the Soviet leader that it was now possible to support a North Korean attack on South Korea.

	...Despite the new American strategic policy, Stalin nonetheless remained worried that military action on the Korean peninsula might prompt the US to intervene. He therefore made it clear to Kim Il Sung that the Soviet Union would under no circumstances send its troops to his assistance.

	...Mao then warned his eager Korean ally that the presence of Japanese troops might prolong the war, and that it was, in any case, “not so much the Japanese, as the Americans themselves who could interfere in the war[sic.].” Kim deflected this implied criticism by repeating Stalin’s judgment that the Americans do not show any inclination to engage themselves militarily in the Far East. They left China without fighting; the same approach can be expected in Korea.

	...Meanwhile, throughout the spring of 1950, signs multiplied indicating increasing American commitment to South Korea and to resisting communist expansion worldwide—NSC-68, a $100 million economic and military aid package for South Korea approved by Congress in March, and visits by high-ranking American officials to Seoul.27Nonetheless, despite Stalin’s continued nervousness about the risks involved, preparations for the campaign against South Korea proceeded rapidly after Kim and Pak’s return from Beijing.


	...As the invasion date drew near, Stalin continued to be concerned about the possibility of American intervention. Although he approved Shtykov’s request on June 20 to allow the KPA to use Soviet ships—presumably from Vladivostok or Port Arthur—for amphibious landings, he refused to allow Soviet personnel on the ships “because it may give the adversary a pretext for interference by the USA.”


	...Stalin replied the same day that he agreed “with Kim Il Sung’s idea for an immediate advance along the whole front line.” While this decision may have been sensible from a strictly military point of view, it reflected a disastrous misapprehension of how a World War II-style invasion across the South Korean border would be perceived in the West. Since Stalin had shared with his Western counterparts the trauma of a sudden, massive German attack, his failure to foresee the forebodings such an attack in Korea would immediately evoke in the minds of many of the world’s political leaders is all the more striking.


	...In late August, with American forces unable to break out of the Pusan perimeter, Stalin informed the North Korean leader that the Central Committee “salutes Comrade Kim Il Sung and his friends for the great liberation struggle of the Korean people, which comrade Kim Il Sung is conducting with brilliant success. The CC VKP (b) has no doubt that in the nearest future the interventionists will be driven out of Korea with ignominy.” Stalin also reassured Kim that he “should not be embarrassed” by setbacks in the war against the interventionists. 

		In such a war continuous successes do not occur. The Russians also did not have continuous successes during the Civil War, and even less so during the war with Germany. The greatest success of the Korean people is that Korea has now become the most popular country in the world and has turned into the banner for the movement in Asia for liberation from the imperialist yoke. The armies of all enslaved peoples will now learn from the Korean People’s Army the art of bringing decisive blows to the Americans and any other imperialists. Moreover, Comrade Kim Il Sung should not forget that Korea is not alone now, that it has allies who are helping it and will continue to help it. The situation of Russians during the Anglo-Franco-American intervention in 1919 was several times worse than the situation of Korean comrades today.

	Whatever feelings of euphoria Stalin may have enjoyed at this moment, however, did not lead him to alter the formula he had established in April for the Korean operation; the Soviet Union would provide weapons, supplies and advisers but North Korea would have to rely on China if it needed outside forces.

	...Still calculating that a Chinese intervention would not embroil him in a major war with the United States, he urged Mao to send immediately at least 5-6 divisions, disguised as “Volunteers,” to the th parallel. He seems to have been surprised and irritated when Mao demurred, dismissing Beijing’s invocation of the specter of World War III as a mere pretext for inaction. He reminded Mao that “leading Chinese comrades” had repeatedly expressed their readiness to move several armies to Korea’s support if the adversary crossed the 38thparallel. He also noted pointedly that he had understood such readiness to be due to China’s interest in preventing the peninsula from being transformed into a springboard for future aggression against China by the United States or Japan.

	...The Soviet leader nonetheless conceded that the United States might still be drawn into a big war for the sake of prestige. China could thus be dragged in too, and with it the Soviet Union, “which is bound with China by the Mutual Assistance Pact. Should we fear this?” Stalin asked rhetorically.

		In my opinion, we should not, because together we will be stronger than the USA and England, while the other European capitalist states (with the exception of Germany, which is unable to provide any assistance to the United States now) do not present serious military forces. If a war is inevitable, then let it be waged now, and not in a few years when Japanese militarism will be restored as an ally of the USA and when the USA and Japan will have a ready-made bridgehead on the continent in the form of the entire Korea run by Syngman Rhee.


	...when on the following day the Chinese decided to send their troops after all


http://www3.nccu.edu.tw/~lorenzo/Hao%20Chinas%20Decision.pdf
	China's Decision to Enter the Korean War: History Revisited
	
	Thirty-seven years have passed since the Korean War ended in July 1953. The Korean War, which was one of the most dramatic events of the cold war, resulted not only in huge casualties on the two sides, but also in a deep wound in Sino-American relations which took more than two decades to heal. Vast amounts of research have been done on the war, but one important aspect - the motivation behind the decision of the People's Republic of China to enter the war - remains mysteriously masked, or at least unconvincingly explained.


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	Collaboration between Soviet intelligence and the Chinese Communist Party (CCP) went back to the 1920s. A police raid on the Soviet consulate at Beijing in 1927 uncovered a mass of documents on Soviet espionage in China, the involvement of the CCP and instructions to it from Moscow ‘not to shrink from any measures, even including looting and massacres’ when promoting clashes between Westerners and the local population. The arrest in 1931 of the Comintern representative in Shanghai, Jakov Rudnik (alias ‘Hilaire Noulens’), led to the capture of many more files on Soviet intelligence operations and the Communist underground. A British intelligence report concluded that the files ‘afforded a unique opportunity of seeing from the inside, and on unimpeachable documentary evidence, the working of a highly developed Communist organization of the illegal order’. Among the documents which attracted particular attention were a large number of letters from ‘the notorious Annamite Communist, Nguyen Ai Quac’, later better known as Ho Chi-Minh. But the ‘most outstanding’ document, in the view of British intelligence, was a CCP report on the killing of members of the family of an alleged Communist traitor, Ku Shun-chang, carried out under the direction of Mao Zedong’s future Prime Minister, Zhou Enlai. In 1933 Mao’s security chief, Kang Sheng, arrived in Moscow as deputy head of the Chinese delegation to the Comintern and spent the next four years learning from the example of the NKVD during its most paranoid phase.


http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/download?doi=10.1.1.425.8851&rep=rep1&type=pdf
	In March, the FBI requestioned Whittaker Chambers, a former courier for a Washington, D.C. based Soviet spy ring. ...Chambers’ main concern in coming forward was not espionage so much as these Soviet agents’ ability to influence U.S. policy to the advantage of the Kremlin.


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	...They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	...Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives


http://wunc.org/post/former-spymaster-three-decades-cia
	"...in the 1930s and 1940s when the Soviets basically riddle the FDR administration and the Manhattan Project with - now they're estimating - about 500 spies."


https://books.google.com/books?id=idnZAAAAQBAJ&pg=PA159&lpg=PA159
	Let's see how Mao obtained his evidence against Liu. 'Mao had told it (Liu's case team) he wanted a spy charge. ... A large number of other people were imprisoned and interrogated, to try to turn up evidence against him. ... Shi Zhe, who had interpreted for Liu with Stalin ... was pressed to say that Liu was a Russian spy. ...'

&nbsp;

journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Mao and his supporters at the conference repeatedly pressed Peng to confess a connection with the Soviets. Peng categorically denied that there was any international background to his complaints about the Great Leap Forward. But Mao and his followers – including Liu Shaoqi, Mao’s designated successor, who would later be labeled “China’s Khrushchev” – concluded that Peng served as a “Soviet agent.” 


&nbsp;


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peng_Dehuai
	The Eighth Plenum of the Eighth CCP Central Committee was held in the scenic resort town of Lushan, Jiangxi, on July 2, 1959, to discuss Party members' positions on the Great Leap Forward. 

	...Peng participated in group meetings in the early portion of the conference, gaining consensus among his peers for criticizing the widespread practice of inaccurately reporting agricultural statistics, and emphasizing that "everybody had a share of responsibility, including Comrade Mao Zedong". Peng bluntly criticized the hesitation of senior Party members to disagree with the Party leadership, implying that many Party leaders were cowardly for following orders that they knew were not in the best interests of the Chinese people. After gaining the consensus of several of his peers, Peng developed his opinions more systematically, but was hesitant to bring up the full range of his criticisms in public. Peng discussed his thoughts with several other senior Party leaders, ...and Peng's colleagues encouraged Peng to visit Mao privately in order to win Mao's support for a reversal of the policies of the Great Leap Forward. Peng visited Mao's quarters on the night of July 13, but found Mao asleep, and wrote Mao a "letter of opinion" articulating Peng's ideas instead. Peng delivered the letter to Mao on the morning of July 14, but Mao did not read the letter until July 17. Later on July 17 Mao had Peng's letter widely circulated among the other delegates at the conference. Peng did not intend his letter to be widely read and attempted to prevent its circulation, but was not successful.

	...Peng blamed the problems of the Great Leap on what he called "problems in our way of thinking and style of work", especially the tendency for Party administrators to submit exaggerated production reports, and for Party bureaucrats to accept these figures uncritically.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
	The chairman, sensing that Peng's letter might pose a serious threat to both his continuous revolution programs and his position as China's indisputable leader, responded fiercely. he claimed that Peng had long been a careerist and that his "total negation" of the Great Leap aimed to overturn the party's top leadership. Using his authority and power, the chairman converted the Lushan conference into a denunciation of Peng's anti-party plot" Peng, in turn, lost his position as China's defense minister.

	...It is notable that when Peng Dehuai became the main target of criticism and denunciation during and after this conference, many CCP leaders connected the defense minister's letter to his visit to the Soviet Union and his meetings with Khrushchev. Those who supported Mao asked repeatedly whether Peng's "intentional attack" against Mao and the party had an "international background," that is, the support of the Soviets.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IXKkCXDvYFYC&pg=PA381&lpg=PA381
	The Jiangxi Killing Fields

	...the campaign against counter-revolutionaries began in the spring of 1930.

	...Mao further sent investigators to the 20th army, which was also a recently formed local Jiangxi force. Its leaders mutinied and took some of Mao's henchmen prisoner. They then circulated a document by Mao, now said to be forged, which suggested ... Mao aimed to get rid of and even execute Zhu De and Peng Dehuai. This ploy, if that is what it was, to induce Zhu and Peng to rebel against Mao, failed. ...Peng accepted their suggestion that they letter was a forgery and declared that he would continue to support Mao's Front Committee.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
	...Although Peng categorically denied any such connections, Mao and other party leaders, including Liu Shaoqi--who himself would later be labeled "China's Khrushchev"--persistently claimed that at Lushan, Peng acted as a "Soviet agent."


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Liu-Shaoqi
	...Liu headed the Sino-Soviet Friendship Association in 1949–54...


http://www.nytimes.com/2012/12/09/books/review/tombstone-the-great-chinese-famine-1958-1962-by-yang-jisheng.html
	In the summer of 1962, China’s president, Liu Shaoqi, warned Mao Zedong that “history will record the role you and I played in the starvation of so many people, and the cannibalism will also be memorialized!”


https://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2012/12/10/the-hungry-years
	As Pantsov and Levine point out, “Mao had no concrete plans for the Great Leap Forward.” All he did was repeat the incantation “We can catch up with England in fifteen years.” In fact, as Yang Jisheng’s “Tombstone” shows, neither experts nor the Central Committee discussed “Mao’s grand plan.” The Chinese President and Mao cultist Liu Shaoqi endorsed it, and a boastful fantasy became, as Yang writes, “the guiding ideology of the party and the country.”

	A hundred absurd schemes, such as close planting of seeds for better yields, now flowered, as loudspeakers boomed out the song “We Will Overtake England and Catch Up to America.” Mao constantly looked for ways to productively deploy the world’s biggest national population: farmers were taken out of fields and sent to work building reservoirs and irrigation channels, digging wells, and dredging river bottoms. Yang points out that, since these projects “were undertaken with an unscientific approach, many were a waste of manpower and resources.” But there was no dearth of sycophantic officials ready to run with Mao’s vaguest commands, among them Liu Shaoqi. Visiting a commune in 1958, Liu swallowed the claims by local officials that irrigating yam fields with dog-meat broth increased agricultural output. “You should start raising dogs, then,” he told them. “Dogs are very easy to breed.” Liu also became an instant expert on close planting, suggesting that peasants use tweezers for weeding the seedlings.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peng_Dehuai
	...Mao purged most of Peng's supporters from important offices following the conference, almost completely isolating Peng politically for the rest of his life. Peng later reflected that he was confused that Mao could have interpreted his private letter as a political attack, and wondered why, after thirty years of working together, Mao could not have discussed the matter privately with him, if Peng had indeed made the mistakes Mao claimed he did.


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Mao’s accusation that Peng was a Soviet agent, while completely untrue, had a logical basis. The Great Leap Forward diverged greatly from the Soviet model of socio-economic development...


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	Even though the CCP did not issue any policy statement on Lysenkoism until 1952, Lysenkoism's quest for monopoly and the status of orthodoxy had already been achieved, de facto, with the license and encouragement afford by the CCP's comprehensive pro-Soviet policy of "learning from the advanced experience of the Soviet Union." 
 

 https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	As early as October 1949, Lysenko's representatives were in China, helping Luo Tianyu's campaign. First came V.N Stoletov, Minister of Higher Education and Chair of the Department of Genetics at Moscow University. He lectured at Luo's University, and was soon followed by other Lysenkoist luminaries, such as N. I. Nuzhdin and A. P. Ivanov. These visiting experts traveled extensively throughout China, giving introductory lectures which were rapidly transformed into college textbooks in the Chinese language. The Russians also preached to key scientists about Lysenkoism's scientific validity and effectiveness.


https://books.google.com/books?id=5vgBaLfd9XsC&pg=PA170
	Lysenkoism did not multiply China's harvests, it destroyed them. At the very time when a bewildered peasantry were struggling to come to terms with the disruption of collectivisation, they were made victims of an imposed pseudo-science that caused their crops to wither in the field.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Chinese_Famine
	...Unofficial estimates vary, but scholars have estimated the number of famine victims to be between 20 and 43 million. 


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...The Cultural Revolution radicals not only framed the Soviet Union as negatively as possible, but also tried to fabricate and exaggerate their opponents’ foreign policy errors. Almost all the CCP leaders who were purged during the Cultural Revolution were accused of some sort of connection to the “heinous” Soviet enemy.

	...Many other opponents of Mao, including Liu Shaoqi and Deng Xiaoping, were treated in the same manner. Even though they served as the vanguard of Mao’s crusade against Moscow in the early 1960s, they were inevitably accused of betraying Mao and colluding with Khrushchev revisionists by carrying out a “revisionist” and “counter-revolutionary” foreign policy line.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=kL03BAAAQBAJ&pg=PA132&lpg=PA132
	Liu Shaoqi explained that if the Chinese failed to support the Vietnamese revolutionaries and allowed the enemy to remain the Chinese would meet more difficulty and trouble on their southern borders.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA216&lpg=PA216
	In March and April 1965, top Beijing leaders held a series of discussions about the situation in Vietnam, putting special emphasis on whether Washington would further expand the war by bringing the ground war to North Vietnam and air/ground war to China. A speech made by Deng Xiaoping at a politburo meeting of 12 April, which was also attended by Liu Shaoqi and Zhou Enlai, revealed some of Bejing's basic considerations:

		It seems that the [American] bombardment will continue. The U.S. imperialists' first step was fighting a special war. According to the Vietnamese comrades, the [American] special war has reached a new stage. Our view is that the special war has failed and the war will be expanded. The American air bombardment has penetrated into the airspace only twelve kilometers south of Hanoi, and, if the bombardment continues, it is inevitable that even Hanoi, Hai Phong, and Thai Nguyen will become the targets . . . [I]t is even possible for them, under the excuse of chasing after Vietnamese planes, to invade our airspace. . . . If this is allowed to continue, they will come to Yunnan and Guangxi. Then the war will expand to part of China, and then, to all of China.


http://nsarchive2.gwu.edu/nukevault/ebb517-Nixon-Kissinger-and-the-Madman-Strategy-during-Vietnam-War/
	Nixon, Kissinger, and the Madman Strategy during Vietnam War

	President Richard Nixon and his national security adviser Henry Kissinger believed they could compel "the other side" to back down during crises in the Middle East and Vietnam by "push[ing] so many chips into the pot" that Nixon would seem 'crazy' enough to "go much further," according to newly declassified documents published today by the National Security Archive.

	The documents include a 1972 Kissinger memorandum of conversation published today for the first time in which Kissinger explains to Defense Department official Gardner Tucker that Nixon's strategy was to make "the other side ... think we might be 'crazy' and might really go much further"


http://nsarchive2.gwu.edu/NSAEBB/NSAEBB263/
	Amidst a massive bombing campaign over North Vietnam, Henry Kissinger and Richard Nixon candidly shared their evident satisfaction at the “shock treatment” of American B 52s, according to a declassified transcript of their telephone conversation published for the first time today by the National Security Archive. “They dropped a million pounds of bombs,” Kissinger briefed Nixon. “A million pounds of bombs,” Nixon exclaimed. “Goddamn, that must have been a good strike.” The conversation, secretly recorded by both Kissinger and Nixon without the other’s knowledge, reveals that the President and his national security advisor shared a belief in 1972 that the war could still be won. “That shock treatment [is] cracking them,” Nixon declared. “I tell you the thing to do is pour it in there every place we can…just bomb the hell out of them.” Kissinger optimistically predicted that, if the South Vietnamese government didn’t collapse, the U.S. would eventually prevail: “I mean if as a country we keep our nerves, we are going to make it.”

	...In the April 15, 1972, conversation about bombing North Vietnam, Nixon recalled that bombing had failed to defeat Ho Chi Mhin’s forces in the past.

	Nixon: “Of course, you want to remember that Johnson bombed them for years and it didn’t do any good.”

	Kissinger: But Mr. President, Johnson never had a strategy; he was sort of picking away at them. He would go in with 50 planes; 20 planes; I bet you we will have had more planes over there in one day than Johnson had in a month.

	Nixon: Really?

	Kissinger: Yeah.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-kissinger-russia-putin-232925
	Kissinger, a longtime Putin confidant, sidles up to Trump 


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Obviously, the accusations had been made up by the radicals.

	...As shown in previous chapters, Liu and other moderate leaders did have slightly different views from Mao about China’s Soviet policy at several critical junctures

	...at various critical junctures, Liu and others attempted to mitigate the radicalism in Mao’s Soviet policy and to save the Sino-Soviet alliance from complete rupture. Obviously, traces of their policy preference did not escape the attention of Mao and his radical supporters.

	...But in almost all cases, their views were intended only as suggestions for Mao.

	...But their service to Mao in fighting against Moscow created a political atmosphere in China that would regard only toughness against the Soviets as politically correct.

	...In fact, he intentionally made antagonism towards the Soviets part of the strategy for defeating his domestic political challengers.

&nbsp;


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction
 
	This Staff has received constructive comment on this study from a number of other offices of the Central Intelligence Agency, all of whom agree on the credibility of the essentials of the CCP's case against Lin, and several of whom agree in general with other findings of this study.
 
	...Lin and his proteges had concluded correctly that it was Mao's intention ultimately to purge them. To prevent this and to secure the succession, Lin's group planned a military "coup" against Mao, one which envisaged Mao's assassination if necessary.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4cRgDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA171
	In 1938 when Lin Biao went to the battle in Shanxi, he put on a Japanese uniform presented to him by his Japanese friends and was mistakenly shot by Yan Xi Shan's soldiers and got hurt in the back. He was sent to Moscow for medical treatment
 
 
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
	...in early 1938, Lin was separated from Mao for four years while he was under treatment in the USSR. Lin got on very will with the Russians


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC&pg=PA68
	In March 1938, a severe injury removed Lin from military duty for several years until he resumed active command in 1942. In the winter of 1939 he went to the Soviet Union for medical treatment, but his stay there is shrouded in mystery; it is not even clear where and for how long Lin stayed in the hospital. Li Tianmin believes that the purpose of Lin's stay in the Soviet Union was not just medical. Ten other military officers accompanied him, most of who stayed at the Frunze Military Academy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=no4bCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA92
	Lin Biao's commander on the ground at Siping was Li Tianyou ...in 1939 he was sent to the Soviet Union for treatment of "severe neurosis." Li stayed in Russia for around four years, undergoing medical treatment and then studying as a special student at the Frunze military academy.
 
 
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/northkorea/10740104/North-Korean-intelligence-official-tells-of-aborted-coups-and-assassination-attempts.html
	North Korean intelligence official tells of aborted coups and assassination attempts 

	...In an extraordinarily rare behind-closed-doors breifing, the official also detailed two attempted coups against the regime, following uprisings in the Korean People's Army, especially among the officers who had been trained in the former Soviet Union.

	He described how North Korean officers who had graduated from Moscow's Frunze military academy had been persuaded by Russian officials to feed intelligence back to the Kremlin.

	In one plot, a group of officers hoping to provoke a Russian intervention against the regime planned to stage a bomb attack on the Russian consulate in the North Korean city of Chongjin. In another, a north eastern army unit planned a missile strike on key targets in Pyongyang. Both plots, said Mr K, were discovered before they took place.

	Mr K's claims cannot be directly verified, but much of what he said is supported by other sources. He requested that the directorate that he worked for and his current activities in South Korea remain secret.

	Both accounts appear to be supported by circumstantial evidence. North Korea watchers have noted that in 1994, a group of officers who had studied in Russia were rounded up and imprisoned, in what became known as the "Frunze Affair".


http://ieas.berkeley.edu/gas/sjas/sjas_journal/v1_2010_Fall.pdf
	James Lin discusses the political indoctrination program implemented in officer training at the Whampoa Military Academy in China under the Kuomintang (KMT) during the 1920s. Drawing from recently opened archival sources and new scholarship, Lin shows that the indoctrination program, historically rooted in a KMT-Soviet alliance, drew not only from Nationalist leader Sun Yat-sen's Three Principles of the People, but also from Leninist thought. The incorporation of Leninist ideology, and the motivations behind grounding the Whampoa indoctrination system in ideology as opposed to loyalty to a region or a province, provoke broader historical questions on nation building in Republican China.
 
	...the Russian observers only seemed to believe that Sun's personal bodyguards were absolutely loyal to him.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction

	...When Lin's plans for a coup were frustrated, he attempted to flee to the USSR


https://books.google.com/books?id=mhq8DAAAQBAJ&pg=PA188&lpg=PA188
	Soon after the car drove out, Ye Qun said to Lin Biao: "Li Wen-pu and Lao Yang [the driver] are loyal to the Chief." Lin kept quiet. After a while, Lin Biao asked Lin Li-guo: "How far is Irkutsk?"


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...The radical Maoist strategy of using the Soviet Union as an external scape-goat proved to be effective not only in terms of wiping out domestic rivals, but also in leaving a deep memory of the Soviet adversary among the Chinese people for years afterward.

&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=5NsMWCHDStQC&pg=PA106
	...To this day, when ordinary people who survived the famine are asked what, in their opinion, caused mass starvation, the answer almost invariably points to the Soviet Union.

&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...It is my hope that scholars and analysts may find this approach useful in understanding many complicated issues in today’s world, where differences among civilizations are playing a far more important role than traditional security concerns, and terrorism, very often fueled by religious and ideological extremism, has become a grave threat to individual lives and the national security of many countries.


&nbsp;


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/monkey-cage/wp/2014/10/21/kissinger-the-constructivist/
	Henry Kissinger would rank in anyone’s top 10 list of the most important realists in the history of international relations theory and practice. As national security adviser and secretary of state, and as a prolific author, he became synonymous with dexterous, amoral diplomacy and a cold-blooded pragmatism attuned only to the balance of power and the pursuit of national interest.


https://dr.ntu.edu.sg/bitstream/handle/10220/7593/WP225.pdf;sequence=1
	Rising from within : China's search for a multilateral world and its implications for Sino-U.S. relations

	Li, Mingjiang

	...Washington should be prepared to plan its China policy on this basis and Sino-U.S. relation will largely be shaped by the dynamics of contentions for power and interest...


&nbsp;


https://dr.ntu.edu.sg/bitstream/handle/10220/4552/WP165.pdf?sequence=1
	Soft power in Chinese discourse : popularity and prospect

	Li, Mingjiang

	...I argue that a grand Chinese soft power strategy is still in its embryonic phase

	...Observers of Chinese politics and international relations could hardly have failed to notice the upsurge of references to the term “soft power” in China in recent years. The popularity of this concept among Chinese political leaders, scholars, journalists and pundits has been striking.


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	Beijing's spy networks in the United States include up to 25,000 Chinese intelligence officers and more than 15,000 recruited agents who have stepped up offensive spying activities since 2012, according to a Chinese dissident with close ties to Beijing's military and intelligence establishment.


&nbsp;


https://www.newyorker.com/news/news-desk/the-us-has-more-to-lose-than-russia-in-spy-expulsions
	“There are more Russian operatives, declared and undeclared, in the United States now than at any other time in the past fifteen years,” the official told me. “They’re here in large numbers, actively trying to penetrate a whole host of sectors—government, industry, and academia.”

&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	...According to the businessman, defensive intelligence was mainly focused on learning about the United States. The operations then shifted in 2012 to "offensive" spying, he said.

	"By offensive [operations], I mean to be ready to destroy the U.S. in ways they can," Guo said.


&nbsp;


http://listverse.com/2015/08/29/10-dastardly-secret-operations-of-the-kgb/
	KGB agents sought to plan and carry out a series of attacks on America’s power systems.

	Hydroelectric dams, which generate a significant portion of the US’s energy supply, were a target. The KGB formulated an elaborate plan to destroy two large hydroelectric dams, the Hungry Horse Dam and Flathead Dam, in Montana. Taking the two dams out of commission would cripple the power supply of the state and surrounding region. The attack was to begin 3 kilometers (2 mi) down the South Fork River from Hungry Horse Dam. The KGB planned to have operatives destroy power pylons on top of a tall mountain slope, which would be difficult to get back online, indefinitely knocking out power transmission from the dam. Then, the operatives were to seize the Hungry Horse Dam’s controls and destroy them. The attacks would have knocked out the power supply to all of New York state.


https://www.rferl.org/a/european-remembrance-day-ukraine-little-known-ww2-tragedy/25083847.html
	...As Nazi troops approached the city, Moscow sent in agents from the NKVD, the predecessor of the KGB, to blow up the city's DniproHES hydroelectric dam.

	The team successfully carried out its secret mission -- which historians say was ordered by Stalin himself -- tearing a hole in the dam and temporarily cutting off part of the city from the invaders.

	But the explosion also flooded villages and settlements along the Dnieper River.

	The tidal surge killed thousands of unsuspecting civilians, as well as Red Army officers who were crossing over the river.

	Since no official death toll was released at the time, the estimated number of victims varies widely. Most historians put it at between 20,000 and 100,000, based on the number of people then living in the flooded areas.


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."In addition to that, they developed between 15,000 to 18,000 other spies, and these are not directly sent but these are developed within the United States."

	The recruited agents are not limited to Asians and Chinese-Americans but include all ethnic groups, including Hispanics, Blacks, and Caucasians.

	...China's intelligence targets included several strategic areas of the United States.

	"The first is to obtain military weapons-related technology. This is priority No. 1," Guo said.

	Second, Chinese intelligence is engaged in "buying" senior U.S. officials personally, and a third objective is buying family members of American political or business elites "with a view to getting intelligence and to make big business deals in China's favor," he said.

	A fourth priority is penetrating the American internet system and critical infrastructure by implanting malicious software.

&nbsp;

https://cyberx-labs.com/en/blog/dhsfbi-report-says-russian-cyber-units-attacked-critical-infrastructure-blackenergy/
	DHS/FBI Report Confirms Russian Cyber Units Attacked Critical Infrastructure with BlackEnergy and Other Malware


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	"And they have successfully penetrated all the major defense weapons suppliers of the U.S. government," Guo said, adding that "the scale of their operations is mind boggling."

	..."The United States is bleeding and is unaware that sooner or later the United States will run out of blood," Guo said.

	Also, the United States is overly reliant on technical spying while China has an asymmetrical advantage in using its tens of thousands of human spies.

	China also is working to subvert the United States by working together with rogue regimes, such as those in North Korea and Iran.


&nbsp;


http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/europe/5284938.stm
	...Last week Israeli officials said they had provided Moscow with proof that Hezbollah had been supplied with Russian weapons delivered to the Syrian Army.

	Mr Ivanov said that it was "laughable" to call the anti-tank weapons he understood to have been used by Hezbollah modern.

	...The defence minister also reiterated Russia's view on Iran's uranium enrichment programme. He said that any talk of sanctions was premature and not worthwhile. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/06/05/russia-boosts-trade-north-korea-china-cuts/102389824/
	As China pulls trade from North Korea, Russia gets cozy with Kim Jong Un


http://www.businessinsider.com/r-from-russia-with-fuel-north-korean-ships-may-be-undermining-sanctions-2017-9
	Russia is reportedly going around sanctions and supplying North Korea with fuel

&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."So in a fight between rogues and a gentleman, the rogues will always win," he said, "because the gentlemen fight a civilized war. The rogues do not fight a civilized war."

	...In Hong Kong, the MSS dispatched an additional 3,000 intelligence officers to the former British colony after the May 2013 incident involving former NSA contractor Edward Snowden, who fled to Hong Kong after stealing some 1.7 million secret agency documents.


&nbsp;


http://www.abc.net.au/radio/programs/am/snowden-flees-to-russia-avoiding-extradition/4775048
	Snowden flees to Russia, avoiding extradition


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	...Guo said Americans need to understand that China is not ruled by a normal government.

	"You should look at it as a mafia-like organization," he said.

	..."If this relationship is not managed well, I think the whole of humanity will confront major problems," he said. "The current approach adopted by the American ruling elite is tantamount to suicide."

	Guo warned of the dangers of a world dominated by the current anti-democratic Chinese system.

	"If we do not have the United States exercising some kind of control over the world system, the world will turn into a place where men eat men," he said.


&nbsp;


http://www.atimes.com/article/cia-analyst-beijing-poses-greater-threat-russia/
	CIA analyst: Beijing poses a greater threat than Russia
	By Bill Gertz


https://www.amazon.com/dp/B00BSESA22/ref=dp-kindle-redirect?_encoding=UTF8&btkr=1
	The China Threat: How the People's Republic Targets America
	by Bill Gertz

	The devastating terrorist attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon and America's first domestic bio-terrorism mail attacks have shifted America's attention and resources to the immediate threat of international terrorism. But we shouldn't be fooled. Since the publication of the hardcover edition of The China Threat in November of 2000, one thing remains very much the same: the People's Republic of China is the most serious long-term national security challenge to the United States. In fact, after the events of September 11, the China threat should seem all the more real, for Communist China is one of the most important backers of states that support international terrorism.
	—From the new introduction by the author


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	...The unexpected surge of international terrorism in the early 1970s and the precedent set a few years before by the KGB’s use of Sandinista guerrillas against US targets in Central and North America 19 encouraged the Centre to consider the use of Palestinian terrorists as proxies in the Middle East and Europe...


&nbsp;


http://www.atimes.com/china-under-fire-for-not-reining-in-north-korea-gertz/
	China under fire for not reining in North Korea: Gertz
	By Bill Gertz

	...Michael Rubin, a resident scholar at the American Enterprise Institute, blames China for the growing North Korean threat.

	...“North Korea is China’s client. North Korea wouldn’t have gotten this far if China didn’t want them to.”

	...The Chinese failure to prevent a growing North Korean nuclear and missile threat 


http://articles.latimes.com/2000/sep/06/news/mn-16274
	...a rogue team of Russian missile scientists--thrown out of work after the collapse of the Soviet Union--may have moved to North Korea. And there, for profit or glory or both, they have directed the North Korean program--with the North Koreans themselves doing little more than putting the pieces together.

	The missile experts who have been gathering evidence to support this theory phrase it in much drier terms, of course.

	"It must be concluded that various Russian companies--not necessarily the Russian government--and North Korean authorities are closely cooperating in the missile programs," wrote German missile technology specialist Robert H. Schmucker in a recent paper.

	"From these [Russian] institutions, North Korea received everything necessary to manufacture or assemble missiles. . . . The future of North Korea's work and success depends completely on the Russian involvement."

	Timothy McCarthy, senior analyst at the Monterey Institute of International Studies, says he has been quietly examining for months the possibility that some Russians are continuing to provide key components for the North Korean missiles.

	There is no evidence to suggest that the Russian government has been involved.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/northkorea/1523468/Russia-secretly-offered-North-Korea-nuclear-technology.html
	Russia secretly offered North Korea nuclear technology

	Russia is facing criticism after secretly offering to sell North Korea technology that could help the rogue state to protect its nuclear stockpiles and safeguard weapons secrets from international scrutiny.

	Russian officials touted the equipment at an IT exhibition in Pyongyang a fortnight ago - just days before the Communist state caused international alarm by launching a salvo of short and long-range missiles into the Sea of Japan.


https://spectator.sme.sk/c/20654382/foreign-rocket-engines-for-north-korea-why.html
	In early August 2017, German rocket scientist Robert Schmucker published in the Deutsche Welle his opinion that North Korea´s ballistic missiles program can only exist due to transfers of Russian and Soviet rocket engines and components. Schmucker stopped short of accusing Moscow of providing Pyongyang with technology intentionally. Five days later, the New York Times published an article linking North Korea missiles to Ukrainian rocket engines.


http://www.dw.com/en/where-did-north-korea-get-its-missile-technology/a-40107204
	Observers in Kyiv believe that the Times article may be part of a targeted campaign by Russia. In an analysis published on Tuesday, the Center for Army, Conversion and Disarmament Studies (CACDS) in Kyiv wrote that the US publication shows "signs of an information attack on Ukraine." Among other things, the aim of the article is apparently to divert attention from "their own missile technology shipments to North Korea" and to discredit Ukraine, especially in the eyes of the US.

	"Russia shares a border with North Korea, so one can deliver anything, even entire engines," said Mykhailo Samus, the CACDS deputy director for international affairs. Ukraine, on the other hand, would have logistical problems, he said.

	TUM's Robert Schmucker said that the latest story is about more than just the engines. "What about the missiles? The information itself is of no use; you need production facilities, technical equipment and above all, good quality control," he said. "A lot more must have come from Ukraine than just a few engines."


http://articles.latimes.com/2000/sep/06/news/mn-16274
	...debate has broken out among missile experts about the degree of Russian involvement in producing North Korea's missiles.

	Virtually everyone agrees that, at a minimum, the North Korean program began in the 1980s with Russian help, and that the North Korean missiles are based upon Russian designs.

	...It's also undisputed that in October 1992, Russian security officials detained more than 60 Russian missile specialists at Moscow's Sheremetyevo airport as they were about to leave for North Korea.

	...Some experts believe the Russian help for the North Korean missiles stopped in the early 1990s. "The paper trail ended eight years ago," says Pike.

	But others believe the Russian work has continued right up to today. They point to the Russian-style design of the North Korean missiles and to the fact that they were developed more rapidly, and with fewer flight tests, than those of other nations.

	...There also have also been some remarkable customs seizures in Europe of missile parts that North Korea was exporting, these experts say. The parts appear to be Russian. "The components bear Cyrillic markings on them," McCarthy says.


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/fired-nsc-aide-reveals-political-warfare-operation-targeting-trump/
	Fired NSC Aide Reveals Political Warfare Operation Targeting Trump
	Higgins memo warns of Marxist, Deep State subversion

	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."This is not politics as usual but rather political warfare at an unprecedented level that is openly engaged in the direct targeting of a seated president through manipulation of the news cycle," he said.

	...Higgins's firing, along with that of two other NSC conservatives, Derek Harvey and Ezra Cohen-Watnick, has set off political infighting and charges from conservatives that National Security Adviser Lt. Gen. H.R. McMaster is opposing Trump's populist policies in favor of maintaining the policies of the former Obama administration.

	Harvey, a retired Army colonel, recently complained to McMaster about the large number of officials who were kept on at the NSC from the Obama administration. He was told by McMaster that he has a "leadership problem," according to people close to the matter.

	Cohen-Watnick was senior director for intelligence programs at the NSC and ran afoul of McMaster because of his conservative views.

	A White House official said McMaster appears to be trying to clear out anyone from the NSC staff who is outspokenly pro-Trump and has been slow-rolling the president's directives that he disagrees with.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/aug/05/donald-trump-hr-mcmaster-israel-breitbart
	Twitter accounts linked to Russian propaganda operations were also pushing a #FireMcMaster slogan, and at one point it was the top hashtag among 600 pro-Kremlin accounts


&nbsp;


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2010/dec/1/inside-the-ring-843880610/
	Inside the Ring: Counterspies hunt Russian mole inside National Security Agency
	By Bill Gertz 

	...One sign that the probe is fairly advanced is that FBI counterintelligence agents are involved in the search.

	“They are looking for one or more Russian spies that NSA is convinced reside at Fort Meade and possibly other DoD intel offices, like DIA [Defense Intelligence Agency],” the former official said. “NSA is convinced that at least one is at NSA.”

	Some of the 10 illegals who were posing as U.S. citizens helped service Russian agents working inside the U.S. intelligence community, the former official said.

	No other details of the investigation could be learned.


https://www.csmonitor.com/1995/0616/16204.html
	 Psst! Have a White House Secret 

	...In recent months, Bill Gertz of the conservative Washington Times has had an amazing run of stories quoting secret documents and meetings, all embarrassing to the administration. A secret memo from Robert Bell, a national security aide, indicated the talks with the Russians before the May summit were stalled.

	A secret memo from Ashton Carter, a Pentagon official, talked of offering the Russians technology as bait for an agreement. Conversations were quoted between John Deutch, then deputy secretary of defense, and his Russian counterpart.

	One can understand that a president can find it disconcerting when secret deliberations and bargaining positions are laid bare. So along came a May 2 memo, signed by Mr. Clinton, to cabinet members and heads of security agencies, ordering them to take "necessary measures to protect classified information and to refer leaks to the Justice Department for criminal prosecution."


http://articles.latimes.com/2008/jul/25/local/me-mak25
	Citing a journalist's need to keep news sources confidential, a federal judge in Santa Ana declined Thursday to order a reporter to reveal the names of federal officials who leaked information to him for a 2006 story about a grand jury investigation into a scheme to send sensitive military technology to China.

	Washington Times reporter Bill Gertz was subpoenaed to testify in federal court by U.S. District Judge Cormac Carney.

	...Gertz, who reports on national security issues, had filed a brief before Thursday's hearing saying that he would be unwilling to disclose his sources. 


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/u-s-vulnerable-to-bio-warfare-attack/
	U.S. Vulnerable to Bio Warfare Attack

	BY: Bill Gertz

	...Four bioweapons experts told the House Armed Services subcommittee on emerging threats that terrorists could easily manufacture bacterial weapons like tularemia, an infectious disease that U.S. bioweapons tests in the 1960s revealed capable of producing deaths in the tens of thousands through weaponized infectious diseases.

	Rogue states like North Korea and Syria also are suspected of having germ weapons and stockpiles, the experts said.

	..."Tularemia is widely disseminated in nature and easily obtained. SEB causes rapid incapacitation and is also lethal in high concentrations."

	Both agents and the means to deliver them were manufactured by the U.S. military and stockpiled, he said. The arms would be used in combination: one for rapid effect and the other for lethality.

	...On Russia the report was categorical in stating, "Russian entities remained engaged … in BW-relevant activities."

	...Bruce Bennett, senior defense analysts with the RAND Corp., said North Korea has a major biological weapons program that included anthrax, cholera, smallpox, and plague, the latter two being infectious diseases.

	"North Korean special forces are a likely means of delivering biological weapons," Bennett said. "The North has some 200,000 special forces, some of whom could deliver devastating biological attacks against South Korea, Japan, and even the United States."

	Depending on wind, weather, and population density, "these forces could infect perhaps 50,000 people per kilogram of anthrax used," he said.

	..."There are very real and very significant dangers in the world, and the foremost target is America and Americans.


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/russia-says-u-s-expanding-bioweapons-labs-in-europe/
	Russia Says U.S. Expanding Bioweapons Labs in Europe
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."Today, Putin has underwritten into law these and other similar threat evaluations," he stated in a report published by the Jamestown Foundation. "Russian countermeasures are surely forthcoming."

	The strategy "correctly reflects the overall Kremlin notion of Russia being besieged on all sides by the U.S. and its proxies, which purportedly seek to isolate, subvert, and cause internal political and social upheaval to bring about regime change in other countries," Felgenhauer stated.

	"In turn, Putin’s Russia is ready to defy and push back on all fronts — in Syria, in Ukraine, in the Arctic — and by all means available."

&nbsp;


http://www3.nccu.edu.tw/~lorenzo/Hao%20Chinas%20Decision.pdf
	Conclusion

	China's decision to enter the Korean War was made in a risky and uncertain situation with a very complicated historical background.


&nbsp;


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/ACFAEF.pdf
	...when on the following day the Chinese decided to send their troops after all, prompting Stalin to revoke his evacuation order, he placed sharp limitations on Soviet military assistance to China in order to minimize the risk of provoking a direct conflict with the United States. He sent to China only four skeleton divisions of fighter planes and two of ground attack aircraft,43 along with 16 training aircraft, 10 tank regiments, supply and service units, and ammunition. Soviet airplanes and tanks were to be used, moreover, only to train Chinese troops; Stalin categorically forbade their use at the front. The Soviet personnel who operated these crafts were to remain in China for the shortest time possible, returning to the USSR as soon as the training course was completed. While in China, Soviet military personnel were ordered to wear Chinese uniforms and Soviet airplanes and tanks were to be similarly camouflaged.44 By November 1 Stalin amended his orders to allow Soviet fighter planes to cover Chinese bases near the border and protect the bridges over the Yalu River, but he forbade them to pursue American planes over enemy-held territory for fear that a downed Soviet pilot could be taken prisoner and thus expose the Soviet presence in the war.


	...Failing to grasp the relationship between Washington and Seoul, he exaggerated the threat of a US-sponsored invasion of North Korea. He also failed to foresee that a World War II-style invasion of South Korea would generate widespread fear that the Soviet Union was embarking on the same kind of piecemeal aggression that had led to the recent global cataclysm. This failure led to the very intervention Stalin was attempting to avoid, and greatly strengthened the ties between the United States and its allies that he hoped to weaken. Perhaps most importantly, Stalin’s assessment of the danger that the United States might intervene in Korea, or that it might expand the war beyond the peninsula once it did intervene, reveal that he interpreted US restraint in China and Korea as a weakness to be exploited rather than as a reassurance that could profitably be reciprocated. Nothing, it seems, could reassure the pathologically suspicious dictator; he could only be deterred.	 